apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="contre__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/a__pr">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l>     <r>a<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ux</l>        <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ux</l>        <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/de__pr">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>de</l>    <r>de<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>du</l>        <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>       <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>       <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="devant_/que__pr">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>que</l>       <r>que<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>que</l>   <r>que<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ce__postadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="postadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="franc__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/ot__predet">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ota</l>       <r>ot<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôs</l>        <r>ot<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ués</l>       <r>ot<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otes</l>      <r>ot<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/ot__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ota</l>       <r>ot<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôs</l>        <r>ot<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ués</l>       <r>ot<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otes</l>      <r>ot<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="què__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quint__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quâl__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/se__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>se</l>    <r>se<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="je__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="te__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/il__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>il</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" a="Vouiquipèdia" c="use_sub"><p><l>ol</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'l</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	<!-- Stich conseille ne pas l'utiliser, bien qu'il l'accepte -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>‘l</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	<!-- Stich conseille ne pas l'utiliser, bien qu'il l'accepte -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-il</l>      <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ils</l>       <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el</l>    <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ele</l>       <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ela</l>       <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lyé</l>       <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>le</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'l</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	<!-- Stich conseille ne pas l'utiliser, bien qu'il l'accepte -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>‘l</l>        <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	<!-- Stich conseille ne pas l'utiliser, bien qu'il l'accepte -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-el</l>      <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-ele</l>     <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-ela</l>     <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eles</l>      <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lyés</l>      <r>il<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>il</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ils</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>el</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>els</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="o__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/on__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-on</l>      <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ce">              <i>ce</i><par n="ce__postadv"/></e>
<e lm="cé">              <i>cé</i><par n="ce__postadv"/></e>
<e lm="lé">              <i>lé</i><par n="ce__postadv"/></e>
<e lm="que">             <i>que</i><par n="ce__postadv"/></e>
<e lm="qué">             <i>qué</i><par n="ce__postadv"/></e>
<e lm="a">               <i></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="de">              <i></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a la façon de">   <i>a<b/>la<b/>façon<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="chiéz">           <i>chiéz</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="d'aprés">         <i>d'aprés</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="de vers">         <i>de<b/>vers</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="devant">          <i>devant</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="devant que">      <i>devant<b/></i><par n="devant_/que__pr"/></e>
<e lm="du fllanc de">    <i>du<b/>fllanc<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en">              <i>en</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en tenent compto de"><i>en<b/>tenent<b/>compto<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fôra">            <i>fôra</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="jusqu'a">         <i>jusqu'</i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="por lo profit de"><i>por<b/>lo<b/>profit<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="que regârde">     <i>que<b/>regârde</i><par n="contre__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rapôrt a">        <i>rapôrt<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tant que">        <i>tant<b/></i><par n="devant_/que__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tant qu'a">       <i>tant<b/>qu'</i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="u comencement de"><i>u<b/>comencement<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="u moyen de">      <i>u<b/>moyen<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="brâvament">       <i>brâvament</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="brâvo" a="alanfavre"><i>brâvo</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="rudo" a="Vouiquipèdia"><i>rudo</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="franc">           <i>franc</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="grôs">            <i>grôs</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="très">            <i>très</i><par n="franc__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="tot">             <i>t</i><par n="t/ot__predet"/></e>
<e lm="très-tot">        <i>très-t</i><par n="t/ot__predet"/></e>
<e lm="se">              <i></i><par n="/se__prn"/></e>
<e lm="'n">              <i>'n</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="je">       <p><l><a/>je</l>    <r>prpers</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="te">       <p><l><a/>te</l>    <r>te</r></p><par n="te__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="te">       <p><l><a/>te</l>    <r>prpers</r></p><par n="te__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ye">       <p><l><a/>ye</l>    <r>ye</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="en">              <i>en</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="end">             <i>end</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="il">              <par n="/il__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="je">       <p><l>je</l>        <r>je</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="jo">              <p><l>jo</l>        <r>jo</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="mè">              <p><l>mè</l>        <r>mè</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nen">             <i>nen</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nend">            <i>nend</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="o">               <i>o</i><par n="o__prn"/></e>
<e lm="on">              <par n="/on__prn"/></e>
<e lm="qui">             <i>qui</i><par n="què__prn"/></e>
<e lm="qui t'o que" c="SAV"><i>qui<b/>t'o<b/>que</i><par n="què__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quin">            <i>quin</i><par n="quint__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quint">           <i>quint</i><par n="quint__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quâl">            <i>quâl</i><par n="quâl__prn"/></e>
<e lm="què">             <i>què</i><par n="què__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tot">             <i>t</i><par n="t/ot__prn"/></e>
<e lm="t'o que" c="SAV"> <i>t'o<b/>que</i><par n="què__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="te">       <p><l>te</l>        <r>te</r></p><par n="te__prn"/></e>
<e lm="très-tot">        <i>très-t</i><par n="t/ot__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tu">              <p><l>tu</l>        <r>tu</r></p><par n="te__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tè">              <p><l>tè</l>        <r>tè</r></p><par n="te__prn"/></e>
<e lm="y">               <i>y</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ye">       <p><l>ye</l>        <r>ye</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
